Tennessee statutes. Title 46 Cemeteries
Part 3

Records and Report, Violations, and Criminal and Civil Penalties

46-1-301. Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner is responsible for administering and enforcing this chapter.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. All rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commissioner may seek relief at law or equity to restrain or enjoin any act or practice in violation of this chapter, or of any rule and regulation promulgated for the administration or enforcement of this chapter. Jurisdiction is conferred upon the chancery and circuit courts of this state to hear and determine such a suit. No bond is required for the prosecution of the suit or for the issuance of an injunction.

Acts 1992, ch. 922, § 1; 1994, ch. 875, § 1; 2003, ch. 81, § 6; T.C.A. § 46-1-108; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4; 2012, ch. 560, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-1-108 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-302. Penalty for failure to file report.

Any owner or officer of a cemetery company or officer of the trustee of the respective improvement care fund who willfully fails to make the required report, or to file the report of the trustee, required in this chapter, commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Upon failure to receive an annual report from any cemetery company when due, the commissioner shall be notified, and shall immediately notify the cemetery company, by registered letter sent to the address found on the cemetery company's registration form, that the annual report has not been received. Failure of the cemetery company to file the annual report within fifteen (15) days after the registered letter is mailed shall constitute prima facie evidence of willful failure to file, and the commissioner has the discretion to order a conditional suspension of the certificate of registration and institute proceedings as set forth in §§ 46-1-311 and 46-1-312.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 5; Code 1932, § 3927; Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-108; Acts 1976, ch. 773, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 46-208, 46-2-108; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 113; 1995, ch. 485, §§ 3, 4; 1997, ch. 374, § 2; T.C.A.§ 46-2-204; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-204 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Revocation of charter or certificate of authority, § 46-1-309.

46-1-303. Duties and authority of commissioner.

It is the duty of the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized representatives to examine the annual reports made by the cemetery companies and the annual reports made by the trustees, which shall be filed and carefully preserved as a part of the permanent records of the office. The commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized representatives shall audit and examine the books, bank records, cash receipts and any other documents employed in preparing the annual reports of each cemetery company and trustee once every two (2) years. The commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized representatives are authorized to audit and examine the books, bank records, cash receipts and any other documents employed in preparing the annual reports of each cemetery company and trustee more frequently than once every two (2) years whenever it appears to the commissioner that the cemetery company or trustee has failed to comply with any provisions contained in this chapter. Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any cemetery company has failed to comply with any provision contained in this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to examine the cemetery company, including all books, bank records, cash receipts and any other documents employed in the transaction of the cemetery company's business for the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter.

The necessary expense of any examination made pursuant to this section shall be paid by the cemetery company at a rate set by the commissioner.

The commissioner is further authorized, upon the finding of any irregularity or violation of this chapter to allow, at the commissioner's discretion, a reasonable time for the irregularity or violation to be corrected or to enforce compliance with this chapter through the chancery courts or other courts of the state having jurisdiction.

In the event of an audit of a cemetery company authorized by subsection (a), § 46-1-207, § 46-1-214(f), or § 46-1-306, the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized representatives shall provide the cemetery company with the following:

A nonbinding, written exit report containing the initial findings of the audit no more than fourteen (14) days after the conclusion of the field audit on the premises of the cemetery; and

A final written report or a results of examination letter detailing the official findings of the audit no more than sixty (60) days after the conclusion of the audit.

Nothing in this section shall invalidate or in any way lessen any finding of an audit that is not issued within the timeframes described in subsection (d).

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 4; Code 1932, § 3296; Acts 1961, ch. 44, § 4; 1968, ch. 557, § 2; 1968, ch. 627, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-109; Acts 1971, ch. 432, § 1; 1973, ch. 272, §§ 8, 9; T.C.A., §§ 46-209, 46-2-109; Acts 1983, ch. 141, § 1; 1992, ch. 922, § 6; 1995, ch. 203, § 1; 1995, ch. 485, § 5; 1997, ch. 374, § 2; T.CA. § 46-2-205; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4; 2015, ch. 288, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 7 provided that, based on the concern that the current statutory methods of calculating the amounts of the required deposits into the pre-need merchandise and services trust fund and the improvement care trust fund may result in inadequately funded trusts, the commissioner of commerce and insurance shall study the issue and present a report and recommendations, together with any recommended legislation, to the general assembly prior to February 15, 2007.

Former § 46-2-205 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Inspection of trust account records, § 46-1-214.

46-1-304. Standard of cemetery care — Enforcement — Penalty for failure to maintain improvement care fund.

As to matters within its reasonable control, a cemetery company shall maintain its cemeteries so as to reflect respect for the memory of the dead in keeping with the reasonable sensibilities of survivors of those whose remains are interred in the cemeteries.

The district attorney general in whose district a cemetery is situated may bring an action in chancery court to remedy any violation of this section on the petition of five percent (5%) of, or ten (10), lot owners and next of kin of lot owners, whichever is fewer; provided, that only one (1) survivor shall be qualified as a petitioner on account of kinship with one (1) deceased person.

Upon finding that the cemetery is not being consistently maintained as provided in this section, the court shall appoint one (1) or more of the petitioners to perform the maintenance that the court finds to have been neglected and assess the costs of the maintenance to the cemetery company.

After compliance with this section has been achieved, the court shall discharge the appointed petitioner or petitioners; provided, that the cemetery company agrees to provide an appropriate level of maintenance henceforth.

If the trustee of the improvement care trust fund for the benefit of the cemetery has been made a defendant in the action, the court may order the trustee to disburse the net income from the trust to the court or the appointed petitioner or petitioners, and allocate the income to the cost of the maintenance approved by the court.

The officers and directors of a cemetery company commit a Class E felony if they fail to set up and maintain the improvement care trust fund provided in § 46-1-204. They may all be jointly indicted in the same indictment. In addition, they shall be jointly liable at the suit of a lot owner, or descendant or next of kin of a lot owner, for the difference between the amount of the improvement care trust fund as set up by the company and what it should be if set up under the terms of § 46-1-204, plus interest from the date the fund should have been set up. Any recovery under this section or § 46-1-205 shall be for the use of the company and shall be paid into the improvement care trust fund, so as to bring it up to the required amount.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 7; mod. Code 1932, § 3929; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-112; T.C.A., §§ 46-212, 46-2-112; Acts 1986, ch. 693, § 18; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2002, ch. 659, § 1; T.C.A. § 46-2-306; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-306 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

46-1-305. Attorney's fees.

In addition to the liabilities declared in § 46-1-304, the suitor who brings suit and recovers from a stockholder, director or officer of a company shall also recover reasonable attorney's fees, the amount of which shall be fixed and adjudged by the court before whom the case is tried.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 8; mod. Code 1932, § 3930; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-113; T.C.A., §§ 46-213, 46-2-113; T.C.A., § 46-2-307; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-307 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-306. Reasons to refuse to issue or renew, and to revoke or suspend registration — Disciplinary action — Civil penalties — Compliance examination or independent audit — Withholding of earnings and disbursements — Authority to issue citations — Notification and sharing information.

The commissioner may refuse to issue or renew, and may revoke or suspend, the registration of any cemetery registered pursuant to this chapter or corresponding provisions of prior law for any one (1) or more of the following reasons:

Fraud or deceit on the part of a cemetery operator in application for registration;

Cancellation, revocation, suspension or refusal to renew the registration of a cemetery for disciplinary reasons taken against the cemetery operator in any other state for any cause;

Failure on the part of a cemetery operator to maintain compliance with the requirements for issuance or renewal of the registration;

Revocation or suspension of the right of any cemetery operator to practice before any state or federal agency;

Dishonesty, fraud, or gross negligence on the part of a cemetery company or any cemetery operator in the performance of any services regulated by this chapter or chapter 2 of this title;

Violation, on the part of a cemetery operator of any provision of this chapter or chapter 2 of this title, or rule promulgated by the commissioner under this chapter or chapter 2 of this title;

Violation, on the part of a cemetery company or any cemetery operator of any rule of professional conduct promulgated by the commissioner;

Conviction on the part of a cemetery company or any cemetery operator of a felony, or of any crime an element of which is dishonesty or fraud, under the laws of the United States, of this state, or of any other state or country, if the acts involved would have constituted a crime under the laws of this state;

Performance on the part of a cemetery company or any cemetery operator of any fraudulent act while holding an interest in a registered cemetery issued under this chapter or prior law;

Failure on the part of a cemetery company or any cemetery operator, or on the part of the trustee or any officer of the trustee, to timely and completely file the reports required by this chapter;

Failure on the part of a cemetery company or any cemetery operator to set up and fully fund the improvement care trust fund required by this chapter;

Failure on the part of a cemetery company or any cemetery operator to set up and fully fund the pre-need merchandise and services trust fund required by this chapter;

Failure on the part of a cemetery company or any cemetery operator to maintain the cemetery grounds as set forth at § 46-1-304, and in any rule promulgated for the administration or enforcement of this chapter;

Making any false or misleading statement or verification in support of an application for a registration filed by another;

Violation,on the part of a cemetery company or any cemetery operator of the terms of any lawful order entered by the commissioner; and

Selling an interment site or interment right that the cemetery or cemetery operator knew or should have known had been purchased previously by another consumer. This subdivision (a)(16) shall not be construed to prohibit a cemetery company or cemetery operator from selling an interment site that has been determined to have escheated to the cemetery company pursuant to §§ 46-2-103 - 46-2-105. This subdivision (a)(16) shall not be construed to prohibit a consumer who has purchased an interment site from selling or disposing of the interment site in the discretion of that consumer, if the disposition is otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

In addition to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action, the commissioner may assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each separate violation of a law, rule or order pertaining to this chapter. Each day of continued violation constitutes a separate violation.

The commissioner is authorized to assess a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) against the trustee of any trust fund authorized or required by this chapter, for each separate violation of this chapter or of any rule promulgated for the administration or enforcement of this chapter, including, but not limited to, improperly making disbursements from such funds. Each day of continued violation constitutes a separate violation.

In addition to or in lieu of any disciplinary action specifically provided for in subsection (a), (b) or (c), the commissioner may order the following action against any cemetery company found to be in violation of this chapter or any rule promulgated under this chapter:

A compliance examination of the cemetery by the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized representatives, to be funded by the cemetery company;

An independent audit of the cemetery performed by a certified public accountant, to be funded by the cemetery company.

In addition to or in lieu of any disciplinary action against a cemetery company found to be in violation of this chapter or any rule promulgated under this chapter, the commissioner may:

Direct the trustee of a cemetery's improvement care trust fund to withhold earnings and disbursements if the fund is not fully funded in accordance with this chapter; and

Direct the trustee of a cemetery's merchandise and services trust fund to withhold earnings and disbursements if the fund is not fully funded in accordance with this chapter.

The commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized representatives are authorized to issue citations, following an on-site inspection, against cemetery companies for failure to maintain the cemetery grounds as set forth at § 46-1-304.

Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the basis of the citation.

Each citation shall contain an order to cease all violations of this chapter and an assessment of a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to specify those conditions necessary to the issuance of a citation, and the range of penalties for violations of this chapter.

In any proceeding in which discipline provided by subsection (a), (b), (c) or (d) is imposed, the commissioner may also require the respondent cemetery company to pay all costs of the proceeding.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter or chapter 2 of this title.

In any case where the commissioner renders a decision imposing discipline against a cemetery company under this section, the commissioner shall examine the commissioner's records to determine whether the cemetery company holds a registration or a permit in any other state. If so, the commissioner shall notify the cemetery regulatory authority of the other state of its decision, by mail, within forty-five (45) days of rendering the decision. The commissioner may also furnish information relating to proceedings resulting in disciplinary action to other public authorities and to private professional organizations having a disciplinary interest in the registrant. Where a petition for review has been filed pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, the notification and furnishing of information provided for in this subsection (i) shall await the resolution of the review and, if resolution is in favor of the cemetery, no notification or furnishing of information shall be made.

Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4.

46-1-307. Violations — Penalties — Enforcement.

Any cemetery company or seller who, having received any moneys under or in connection with a pre-need sales contract for cemetery merchandise and services, fails to deposit or keep on deposit the moneys as required in this chapter, or who fails to substantially perform the contract described in this chapter, commits a Class E felony.

In addition to other remedies, the commissioner may, upon determining that any deficiency exists in any trust account required under this chapter, order the liquidation of the deficiency upon the terms and conditions that the commissioner determines to be appropriate. If the deficiency has not been liquidated as ordered, the commissioner may bring an action in chancery court to recover the amount of the trust deficiency. Upon finding that a deficiency exists, the court may appoint a receiver to operate the cemetery or, if necessary, order the seizure and sale of the assets of the cemetery company, to the end that the trust be made whole. The court may also award reasonable attorney's fees for the attorney representing the commissioner in an action brought under this section; provided, that the commissioner may not impose any penalty or bring any action against any person, firm or corporation that purchased a cemetery prior to July 1, 1986, with respect to a deficiency in any trust account required under this chapter related to transactions that occurred prior to July 1, 1986.

Acts 1979, ch. 307, § 4(F); T.C.A., § 46-2-207; Acts 1986, ch. 693, § 23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A., § 46-2-407; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4; 2016, ch. 911, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-407 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

46-1-308. Fraud as to pre-need sales contract.

In civil actions in which the prevailing party proves fraud relative to a pre-need sales contract for cemetery merchandise and services under this chapter, the prevailing party shall receive treble damages, together with attorney's fees, costs, and interest.

Acts 1997, ch. 400, § 3; T.C.A. § 46-2-411; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-411 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Fraud as to contract for future services, § 62-5-409.

46-1-309. Revocation of charter or certificate of authority.

Failure to comply with § 46-1-204 or § 46-1-215 shall constitute grounds for the state to revoke the charter or certificate of authority of a corporate cemetery company. The revocation proceeding may be filed in the chancery court of the county where the cemetery is located, and may be brought on relation of the state or district attorney general. The court hearing the proceeding may order the seizure and sale of the cemetery company's assets to the extent necessary to set up the improvement care trust fund as required. If the court revokes the charter or certificate of authority, it may order the sale of the whole company property after the improvement care trust fund has been set up, so that the purchaser of the cemetery may continue to operate and maintain it under the terms of this chapter. The court may also award reasonable attorney's fees for the attorney representing the state in a proceeding brought under this section.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 9; Code 1932, § 3931; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-114; T.C.A., §§ 46-214, 46-2-114; modified; Acts 1986, ch. 693, § 19; T.C.A. § 46-2-308; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-308 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-310. Action by state for recovery of illegally paid dividends.

The state is authorized to recover from stockholders, for the use of the company, dividends illegally paid under § 46-1-205.

The state is also authorized to recover from the officers and directors of the company and the cemetery operators, at any time, for the use of the company, an amount sufficient to bring the improvement care trust fund up to the amount required, together with reasonable attorney's fees for the attorney handling the suit, to be fixed and adjudged by the court trying the case.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 10; Code 1932, § 3932; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-115; T.C.A., §§ 46-215, 46-2-115; T.C.A. § 46-2-309; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-309 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-311. Deficiency in improvement care fund — Failure to file reports — Effect — Orders.

The commissioner may, upon determining that a deficiency exists in the improvement care fund or that a cemetery company has willfully failed to file annual reports, as provided in § 46-1-302, of any cemetery or separate geographical site of a cemetery as required by this chapter, order the correction of the deficiency or failure to file, upon the terms and conditions that the commissioner determines to be appropriate.

While the owner or operator of the cemetery or separate geographical location is in compliance with the terms and conditions of the order, the provisions of § 46-1-205 relative to the payment of dividends, salaries or compensation shall be suspended.

Upon failure of the owner or operator of the cemetery or separate geographical site of a cemetery to correct the deficiency or failure to file as ordered, the commissioner may issue a conditional suspension of the certificate of registration required by § 46-1-103.

The conditional suspension shall be accompanied by an order to correct the deficiency within a stated time, not less than thirty (30) days after issuance of the order.

A conditional suspension of the registration certificate shall not have the effect of interrupting the operation of the cemetery company. It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for an orderly transition from operation by the owner to operation by a receiver, in cases where trust fund deficiencies cannot otherwise be corrected.

If the deficiency is corrected within the time limit stated, further action on the suspension or receivership shall be terminated; provided, that the termination of a suspension shall not be construed to prohibit further actions toward suspension or receivership if a deficiency is determined to exist at a later time.

The commissioner is authorized, upon determining that a substantial deficiency exists in the improvement care fund, to order the cemetery company to correct the deficiency and also to pay to the improvement care fund an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the deficiency.

Acts 1976, ch. 773, § 9; T.C.A., §§ 46-222, 46-2-122; Acts 1995, ch. 485, § 7; T.C.A, § 46-2-311; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-311 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-312. Requirements for appointing a receiver to manage a cemetery.

The Davidson County chancery court, upon the petition of the commissioner, may appoint the commissioner as receiver to take charge of, control and manage a cemetery registered or required to be registered with the commissioner, upon determining that any of the following grounds exist:

The cemetery has not maintained trust funds in the manner required by this chapter;

The cemetery has allowed its registration to lapse, or the registration has been revoked;

The cemetery is impaired or insolvent;

The cemetery has refused to submit its books, records, accounts, or affairs to examination by the commissioner;

There is reasonable cause to believe that there has been embezzlement, misappropriation, or other wrongful misapplication or use of trust funds or fraud affecting the ability of the cemetery to perform its obligation to perform improvement care or deliver cemetery merchandise or services;

The cemetery has failed to file any report required by this chapter;

The cemetery cannot or will not be able to meet all of its contractual obligations when they come due;

A deficiency exists in the improvement care trust fund of any cemetery or separate geographical site of a cemetery; or

The cemetery is not being operated in compliance with the terms and conditions of an order of the commissioner then in force and effect.

For the purpose of this section, the Davidson County chancery court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters brought under this section, and that court is authorized to make all necessary or appropriate orders to carry out the purposes of this part.

Receivership proceedings instituted pursuant to this part shall constitute the sole and exclusive method of liquidating, rehabilitating, or conserving a cemetery, and no court shall entertain a petition for the commencement of the proceedings unless the petition has been filed in the name of the state on the relation of the commissioner.

The commissioner shall commence any such proceeding by application to the court for an order directing the cemetery to show cause why the commissioner should not have the relief prayed for in the application.

On the return of the order to show cause, and after a full hearing, the court shall either deny the application or grant the application, together with such other relief as the nature of the case and the interests of the public may require.

The commissioner may appoint one (1) or more special deputies, who have all the powers and responsibilities of the receiver granted under this section and the commissioner may employ such counsel, clerks and assistants as deemed necessary. The compensation of the special deputy, counsel, clerks and assistants, and all expenses of taking possession of the cemetery and of conducting the proceedings, shall be fixed by the commissioner, with the approval of the Davidson County chancery court, and shall be paid out of the funds or assets of the cemetery. The persons appointed under this subsection (a) shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.

The receiver may take such action as the receiver deems necessary or appropriate to reform and revitalize the cemetery. The receiver has all the powers of the owners and directors, whose authority shall be suspended, except as they are redelegated by the receiver. The receiver has full power to direct and manage, to hire and discharge any employees subject to any contractual rights they may have, and to deal with the property and business of the cemetery.

If it appears to the receiver that there has been criminal or tortious conduct, or breach of any contractual or fiduciary obligation detrimental to the cemetery by any owner, officer, director or other person, the receiver may pursue all appropriate legal remedies on behalf of the cemetery.

If the receiver determines that reorganization, consolidation, conversion, merger or other transformation of the cemetery is appropriate, the receiver shall prepare a plan to effect those changes. Upon application of the receiver for approval of the plan, and after such notice and hearings as the Davidson County chancery court may prescribe, the court may either approve or disapprove the plan proposed, or may modify it and approve it as modified. Any plan approved under this section shall be, in the judgment of the court, fair and equitable to all parties concerned, taking into consideration the overall operation of the cemetery, and the interests of the lot owners, next of kin of lot owners, and descendants of lot owners and the general public. If the plan is approved, the receiver shall carry out the plan.

The receiver so appointed may employ the proceeds from the sale of lots, and all other saleable items and the income from the operation of the cemetery, over and above that portion due the improvement care trust fund, and other special care funds, and the amount reasonably necessary for the operation and maintenance of the cemetery business, to reduce the deficiency in the improvement care trust fund, upon the terms and conditions and in the manner deemed appropriate by the chancellor, taking into consideration the overall operation of the cemetery, and the interests of the lot owners, next of kin of lot owners, and descendants of lot owners and the general public.

If the sole ground for a receivership was a deficiency in the improvement care trust fund, the chancellor shall, upon a showing that the deficiency in the improvement care trust fund has been eliminated, terminate the suspension of the certificate of registration, compensate the receiver, dissolve the receivership, and restore the management of the cemetery to its owner.

Should it appear to the court that it is impossible to correct the deficiency in the improvement care fund, the court may proceed to order the sale of the cemetery as provided in § 46-1-309, or may otherwise order the termination of the use of the land as a cemetery as provided by law.

For purposes of this subsection (e), Davidson County chancery court has exclusive jurisdiction over matters brought under this subsection (e). In addition, any receiver appointed pursuant to this subsection (e) is authorized to use all remedies available to a receiver pursuant to title 56, chapter 9.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, and in addition to or in lieu of any other authority granted to the commissioner by this chapter, the commissioner may file in the Davidson County chancery court a petition alleging, with respect to a cemetery subject to registration pursuant to this chapter:

That there exists grounds that would justify a court order of a deficiency in either the improvement care or pre-need merchandise and services trust fund of a cemetery;

That the interests of the public will be endangered by delay; and

The contents of an order deemed necessary by the commissioner.

Upon a filing under subdivision (e)(2), the Davidson County chancery court may issue, ex parte and without a hearing, the requested order, which shall direct the commissioner to take possession and control of all or a part of the property, books, accounts, documents and other records of a cemetery, and of the premises occupied by it for transaction of its business, and until further order of the court, enjoin the cemetery and its owners, officers, directors, operators, managers, agents and employees from disposition of its property and from the transaction of its business, except with the written consent of the commissioner.

The Davidson County chancery court shall specify in the order what its duration shall be, which shall be such time as the court deems necessary for the commissioner to ascertain the condition of the cemetery. On motion of either party or on its own motion, the court may, from time to time, hold such hearings as it deems desirable after notice as it deems appropriate, and may extend, shorten or modify the terms of the seizure order. The court shall vacate the seizure order, if the commissioner fails to commence a contested case proceeding to impose any appropriate, lawful disciplinary action against the cemetery after having had a reasonable opportunity to do so. An order of the commissioner pursuant to a contested case proceeding under this chapter shall ipso facto vacate the seizure order.

Entry of a seizure order under this section shall not constitute an anticipatory breach of any contract of the cemetery.

The commissioner may appoint one (1) or more special deputies, who have all the powers and responsibilities of the receiver granted under this section and the commissioner may employ such counsel, clerks and assistants as deemed necessary. The compensation of the special deputy, counsel, clerks and assistants, and all expenses of taking possession of the cemetery company and of conducting the proceedings, shall be fixed by the commissioner, with the approval of the Davidson County chancery court, and shall be paid out of the funds or assets of the cemetery. The persons appointed under this section shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.

In the event that the property of the cemetery or its owners, officers, directors or operators does not contain sufficient cash or liquid assets to defray the costs incurred, the commissioner may advance the costs incurred out of any appropriation for the maintenance of the department of commerce and insurance. Any amounts advanced for expenses of administration shall be repaid to the commissioner for the use of the department out of the first available money of the cemetery.

The receiver may take such action as the receiver deems necessary or appropriate to reform and revitalize the cemetery. The receiver has all the powers of the owners, directors and operators, whose authority shall be suspended, except as they are redelegated by the receiver. The receiver has full power to direct and manage, to hire and discharge any employees subject to any contractual rights they may have, and to deal with the property and business of the cemetery.

If it appears to the receiver that there has been criminal or tortious conduct, or breach of any contractual or fiduciary obligation detrimental to the cemetery by any owner, officer, director, operator or other person, the receiver may pursue all appropriate legal remedies on behalf of the cemetery.

If the receiver determines that reorganization, consolidation, conversion, merger or other transformation of the cemetery is appropriate, the receiver shall prepare a plan to effect those changes. Upon application of the receiver of approval of the plan, and after such notice and hearings as the Davidson County chancery court may prescribe, the court may either approve or disapprove the plan proposed, or may modify it and approve it as modified. Any plan approved under this section shall be, in the judgment of the court, fair and equitable to all parties concerned. If the plan is approved, the receiver shall carry out the plan.

Acts 1976, ch. 773, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 46-223, 46-2-123; T.C.A., § 46-2-312; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4; 2010, ch. 665, § 1; 2014, ch. 560, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 911, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-312 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

Acts 2014, ch. 560, § 3 provided that the commissioner for the Tennessee department of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2014, ch. 560, § 4 provided that section 1 of the act, which amended subdivision (a)(1), shall apply to all petitions filed on or after March 21, 2014.

46-1-313. Trespass on or injury to cemetery property — Interference with processions or religious exercises — Penalty.

No person shall willfully destroy, deface, or injure any monument, tomb, gravestone, or other structure placed in the cemetery, or any roadway, walk, fence or enclosure in or around the cemetery, or injure any tree, plant or shrub, or hunt or shoot, play at any game or amusement, or loiter for lascivious or lewd purposes in the cemetery, or interfere, by words or actions, with any funeral procession or any religious exercises.

A violation of this section is a Class E felony.

Following conviction of a person for violating subsection (a), evidence of damages sustained as a result of the violation shall be presented to the jury, which shall ascertain the total amount of the damages. The court shall then render judgment in that amount against the offender in favor of the cemetery and/or the other aggrieved parties and shall order the offender to make full restitution for the damages. Execution of the judgment shall issue as in other civil cases. The order of restitution shall be in addition to other sanctions imposed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1).

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 9; Shan., § 2182; Code 1932, § 3920; Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-118; Acts 1976, ch. 708, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 46-218, 46-2-118; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 40; 1995, ch. 134, § 1; T.C.A. § 46-2-105; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-105 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

Chapter 2, §§ 46-2-101 – 46-2-411, is effective until January 1, 2007. See the parallel reference table at the beginning of this title regarding the reorganization of chapters 1-3 effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Disorderly conduct, § 39-17-305.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Vandalism, § 39-14-408.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 10.